District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.08

Notice of members meeting.

(a)

A limited cooperative association shall notify each member of the time, date, and place of a members meeting at least 15, and not more than 60, days before the meeting.

(b)

Unless the articles of organization otherwise provide, notice of an annual members meeting need not include any purpose of the meeting.

(c)

Notice of a special meeting of members shall include each purpose of the meeting as contained in the demand under § 29-1005.07(a)(3) or (4) or as voted upon by the board of directors under § 29-1005.07(a)(2).

(d)

Notice of a members meeting shall be given in a record unless oral notice is reasonable under the circumstances.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09, § 29-1008.07, and § 29-1012.05.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 508 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Editor's Notes